Maryland, session 2025, HB0984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
4–207.
(a) This section applies only to:
(1) AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE; AND
(2) a gas company, electric company, telephone company, water company,
or sewage disposal company whose gross annual revenues, for the most recent calendar
year for which data are available, are less than 3% of the total gross annual revenues of all
public service companies in the State during the same calendar year.
(b) (1) When the Commission suspends a proposed new rate for AN ELECTRIC
COOPERATIVE OR a company subject to this section that is based on the existing
authorized fair rate of return OR, FOR AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE, THE EXISTING
DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO, the Commission promptly shall institute proceedings
to determine if additional revenues are required to allow the ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE
OR THE company to earn the existing DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO OR THE
EXISTING fair rate of return authorized in the previous base rate proceeding.
– 1 –

Ch. 502 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The Commission shall:
(i) serve each of the parties to the previous base rate proceeding of
that ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE OR THAT company with a copy of the suspension order;
and
(ii) order the ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE OR THE company to
publish a display advertisement about the proposal in newspapers of general circulation in
its service area; AND
(III) ORDER THE ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE TO CONDUCT A
PUBLIC HEARING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 3–104 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(3) Proceedings under this section shall:
(i) account for revenues, expenses, and rate base in the same
manner that the Commission employed in determining a just and reasonable rate in the
previous base rate proceeding; and
(ii) exclude consideration of any increase in the rate of return, OR,
FOR AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE, THE DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO, any change
in rate structure, or any change in an accounting approach to any item pertaining to
revenues, expenses, or rate base inconsistent with that used by the Commission in
determining a just and reasonable rate in the previous base rate proceeding [on] FOR the
ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE OR THE company.
(4) In proceedings under this section, the Commission may use a more
recent past test period than that used in the previous base rate proceeding for the
ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE OR THE company.
(5) The Commission shall enter a final order as to the revenue requirement
determined under this section within 90 days after the proposed new rate is filed.
(6) The final order shall:
(i) authorize a new rate distributing any change in the revenue
requirement proportionally among the ratepayers without change in the rate structure;
and
(ii) state whether further proceedings shall be held.
(7) If, in the final order, the Commission decides to conduct further
proceedings under subsection (c) of this section, the final order may provide for refund,
consistent with the provisions of § 4–204(c) of this subtitle, of any difference between the
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 502
new rate authorized under this subsection and the rate the Commission sets under
subsection (c) of this section.
(c) (1) If the Commission decides to conduct further proceedings under
subsection (b) of this section, the Commission, after a hearing, may:
(i) modify the rate structure;
(ii) lower the authorized fair rate of return OR, FOR AN ELECTRIC
COOPERATIVE, LOWER THE DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO; or
(iii) modify the accounting approach to an item that pertains to
revenues, expenses, or rate base.
(2) The Commission shall take any action under this subsection within 120
days after entry of a final order under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) (1) This section does not apply to a proposed new rate that is filed:
(i) less than 1 year after a previously proposed new rate under this
section is filed; or
(ii) with a request for temporary rates under § 4–205 of this subtitle.
(2) (i) [A] AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE OR A company may not file a
proposed new rate under this subtitle if any proposed new rate filed by the ELECTRIC
COOPERATIVE OR THE company under this section is pending, or a new rate filed by the
ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE OR THE company under this section has been in effect fewer
than 90 days.
(ii) This paragraph does not preclude AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE
OR a company from filing a proposed new rate for a new service if the proposal does not
affect the authorized rate of return OR, FOR AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE, THE DEBT
SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO.
(3) Unless the Commission provides otherwise, this section does not apply
to a proposed new rate that is filed more than 3 years after the Commission enters a final
order authorizing the existing fair rate of return OR, FOR AN ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE,
THE EXISTING DEBT SERVICE COVERAGE RATIO in the previous base rate proceeding.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –